Louisiana, session 2026, HB919.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1868(D) and (E) and 1870(B)(1)(i) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1868. Local pharmacy reimbursement; National Average Drug Acquisition Costs;
appeals
* * *
D. A pharmacy benefit manager, in this state, shall reimburse under-
reimbursed dispensing fees to licensed pharmacies and pharmacists that are not a
pharmacy benefit manager owned company, subsidiary, affiliate, or other related
entity.
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager, in this state, shall bear all costs associated
with the reimbursement of under-reimbursed dispensing fees. These costs shall not
be assigned to plans, members, pharmacies, nor pharmacists.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not reimburse any pharmacy located
in this state:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-796 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 919
(a) An amount less than the most recently published NADAC for a
prescription drug plus this state's professional dispensing fee on the date that the
prescription drug is administered or dispensed.
(b) An amount less than the NADAC plus this state's professional dispensing
fee or wholesale acquisition cost plus this state's professional dispensing fee if the
the NADAC is unavailable on the date the prescription drug is administered or
dispensed.
(c) An amount less than twelve dollars per prescription for a professional
dispensing fee. This Subparagraph shall only apply to an independent pharmacy
with a physical location in this state.
E. Any officer, director, or employee of a pharmacy benefit manager who
willfully and knowingly subscribes to or makes or causes to be made any violations
of under-reimbursing ingredient costs or dispensing fees, provides false reports or
false filings with the intent to deceive the commissioner in the performance of his
duties, pharmacies, or pharmacists, in accordance with this Subpart, upon conviction
thereof shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than five years
or fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars per violation, or both. Any fines
imposed shall be paid by the officer, director, or employee in his individual capacity.
(1) Any pharmacy benefit manager who has an annual revenue over five
hundred million in any line of business shall not have a cap on damages, if the
pharmacy benefit manager is found to be in violation of this Section.
(2) Any pharmacy benefit manager with annual revenues nationally over five
hundred million or a culmination of that amount with its pharmacy benefit manager
or subsidiaries have unlimited liability.
* * *
§1870. Pharmacy benefit manager transparency report; examination by
commissioner
* * *
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-796 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 919
B.(1) On March first of each year, each licensed pharmacy benefit manager
shall submit a transparency report containing data from the prior calendar year to the
department. The transparency report shall contain the following information for each
of the pharmacy benefit manager's contractual or other relationships with a health
benefit plan or health insurance issuer:
* * *
(i) Sufficient information listing any foreign subsidiary as defined in I.R.C.
§3121(I)(8)-1.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:2864 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2864. Duties of pharmacy benefit managers
A. A pharmacy benefit manager shall owe owes a fiduciary duty to the
beneficiaries of any pharmacy benefit management plan administered by the
pharmacy benefit manager and to the entities that have entered into a contract with
the pharmacy benefit manager the duties of good faith, honesty, trust, confidence,
and candor and shall discharge that duty in accordance with the provisions of state
and federal law.
B. The standard for the fulfillment of a pharmacy benefit manager's duties
shall be to act with a high degree of care, skill, prudence, and diligence required of
a reasonable and prudent person with substantial experience and expertise in the
management of pharmacy benefit management plans and payment of claims. A
pharmacy benefit manager shall perform its fiduciary duty with care, skill, prudence,
and diligence, and in accordance with the standards of conduct applicable to a
fiduciary in an enterprise of a like character and with like aims.
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall notify the beneficiaries or contracted
entities to which it acts as a fiduciary in writing of any activity, policy, or practice
of the pharmacy benefits manager that directly or indirectly presents any conflict of
interest with the duties imposed by this Section.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-796 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 919
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager that derives any payment or benefit for the
dispensation of prescription drugs within this state based on volume of sales for
certain prescription drugs or classes or brands of drugs within this state shall pass
that payment or benefit on in full to the covered entity.
(3) A pharmacy benefits manager shall disclose to the covered entity all
financial terms and arrangements for remuneration of any kind that apply between
the pharmacy benefits manager and any prescription drug manufacturer or labeler,
including, without limitation, formulary management and drug-switch programs,
educational support, claims processing, and pharmacy network fees that are charged
from retail pharmacies and data sales fees.
(a) A pharmacy benefits manager providing information in accordance with
this Paragraph may designate that material as confidential. Information designated
as confidential by a pharmacy benefits manager and provided to a covered entity in
accordance with this Paragraph may not be disclosed by the covered entity to any
person without the consent of the pharmacy benefits manager, except that disclosure
may be ordered by a court of this state for good cause shown or made in a court
filing under seal unless or until otherwise ordered by a court.
(b) Nothing in this Paragraph limits the attorney general's use of civil
investigative demand authority in accordance with the Louisiana Unfair Trade
Practices Act to investigate violations of this Section.
C. Failure of a pharmacy benefit manager to satisfy the duties established in
this Section shall not create a separate or independent cause of action nor shall it be
construed to prohibit any cause of action established by or recognized in federal or
state law be a violation of the Louisiana Unfair Trade Practices Act, for which a fine
of not more than ten thousand dollars may be adjudged.
Section 3. (A.) The provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall be given
prospective and retroactive application.
(B.) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall be retroactive for the calendar year, January
1, 2025 through December 1, 2025.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-796 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 919
(C.) Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Section 4. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.